Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.160

Cancellation, acquisition of franchise or permit for operation of public service business in territory incorporated—Regulation of solid waste collection.

The incorporation of any territory as a city or town shall cancel, as of the effective date of such incorporation, any franchise or permit theretofore granted to any person, firm or corporation by the state of Washington, or by the governing body of such incorporated territory, authorizing or otherwise permitting the operation of any public transportation, garbage disposal or other similar public service business or facility within the limits of the incorporated territory, but the holder of any such franchise or permit canceled pursuant to this section shall be forthwith granted by the incorporating city or town a franchise to continue such business within the incorporated territory for a term of not less than the remaining term of the original franchise or permit, or not less than seven years, whichever is the shorter period, and the incorporating city or town, by franchise, permit or public operation, shall not extend similar or competing services to the incorporated territory except upon a proper showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm or corporation to adequately service said incorporated territory at a reasonable price: PROVIDED, That the provisions of this section shall not preclude the purchase by the incorporating city or town of said franchise, business, or facilities at an agreed or negotiated price, or from acquiring the same by condemnation upon payment of damages, including a reasonable amount for the loss of the franchise or permit. In the event that any person, firm or corporation whose franchise or permit has been canceled by the terms of this section shall suffer any measurable damages as a result of any incorporation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35.02 RCW, such person, firm or corporation shall have a right of action against any city or town causing such damages.

After the incorporation of any city or town, the utilities and transportation commission shall continue to regulate solid waste collection within the limits of the incorporated city or town until such time as the city or town notifies the commission, in writing, of its decision to contract for solid waste collection or provide solid waste collection itself pursuant to RCW 81.77.020. In the event the incorporated city or town at any time decides to contract for solid waste collection or decides to undertake solid waste collection itself, the holder of any such franchise or permit that is so canceled in whole or in part shall be forthwith granted by the incorporated city or town a franchise to continue such business within the incorporated territory for a term of not less than the remaining term of the original franchise or permit, or not less than seven years, whichever is the shorter period, and the incorporated city or town, by franchise, permit, or public operation, shall not extend similar or competing services to the incorporated territory except upon a proper showing of the inability or refusal of such person, firm, or corporation to adequately service the incorporated territory at a reasonable price. Upon the effective date specified by the city or town council's ordinance or resolution to have the city or town contract for solid waste collection or undertake solid waste collection itself, the transition period specified in this section begins to run. This section does not preclude the purchase by the incorporated city or town of the franchise, business, or facilities at an agreed or negotiated price, or from acquiring the same by condemnation upon payment of damages, including a reasonable amount for the loss of the franchise or permit. In the event that any person, firm, or corporation whose franchise or permit has been canceled in whole or in part by the terms of this section suffers any measurable damages as a result of any incorporation pursuant to this chapter, such person, firm, or corporation has a right of action against any city or town causing such damages.

[ 1997 c 171 s 1; 1986 c 234 s 24; 1965 ex.s. c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 171: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 171 s 5.]